Maine, session 132, LD205.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11751-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Wild turkey bag limit same as ruffed grouse limit. Limits established by rule
on the maximum number of wild turkey that may be taken within any given period of time
must be the same as the limits on the maximum number of ruffed grouse that may be taken.
Sec. 2. Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife to adopt rules. The
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife shall adopt rules as soon as practicable in
accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 11751-A, subsection 2-A.